California, session 20252026, AB867.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4826 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4826. A person practices veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry, and the various branches thereof, when the person does any one of the following:(a) Represents oneself as engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, veterinary surgery, or veterinary dentistry in any of its branches.(b) Diagnoses or prescribes a drug, medicine, appliance, application, or treatment of whatever nature for the prevention, cure, or relief of a wound, fracture, bodily injury, or disease of animals.(c) Administers a drug, medicine, appliance, application, or treatment of whatever nature for the prevention, cure, or relief of a wound, fracture, bodily injury, or disease of animals, except where the medicine, appliance, application, or treatment is administered by a registered veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant at the direction of and under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian subject to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 4836) or where the drug, including, but not limited to, a drug that is a controlled substance, is administered by a registered veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant pursuant to Section 4836.1. However, no person, other than a licensed veterinarian, may induce anesthesia unless authorized by regulation of the board.(d) Performs a surgical or dental operation upon an animal.(e) Performs a tendonectomy, onychectomy, or any type of claw removal on a feline. (f) Performs any manual procedure for the diagnosis of pregnancy, sterility, or infertility upon livestock or Equidae.(g) Collects blood from an animal for the purpose of transferring or selling that blood and blood component products to a licensed veterinarian at a registered premises, except where the blood is collected by a registered veterinary technician or veterinary assistant at the direction of, and under the direct supervision of, a licensed veterinarian subject to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 4836) or where the blood is collected by a registered veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant pursuant to Section 4836.5. For purposes of this section, “blood and blood component products” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4920.(h) Uses any words, letters, or titles in such connection or under such circumstances as to induce the belief that the person using them is engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, veterinary surgery, or veterinary dentistry. This use shall be prima facie evidence of the intention to represent oneself as engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine, veterinary surgery, or veterinary dentistry.SEC. 2. Section 4826.8 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:4826.8. (a) An onychectomy, tendonectomy, surgical claw removal, or declaw on any feline or any procedure to otherwise alter a feline’s toes, claws, or paws to prevent or impair the normal function of the feline’s toes, claws, or paws shall be performed solely for a therapeutic purpose.(b) For purposes of this section, “therapeutic purpose” means a medically necessary procedure to address an existing or recurring infection, disease, injury, or abnormal condition in the claws, nail bed, or toe bone, which jeopardizes the feline’s health. “Therapeutic purpose” does not include a procedure performed for a cosmetic or aesthetic purpose or to make the feline more convenient to keep or handle.(c) This section shall not prohibit a veterinarian from nail trimming or applying nonsurgical scratching mitigation solutions, such as the application of a device to the tip of a claw.SEC. 3. Section 4827 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4827. (a) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person from:(1) Practicing veterinary medicine as a bona fide owner of one’s own animals, except for the procedures specified in Section 4826.8. This exemption applies to the following:(A) The owner’s bona fide employees.(B) Any person assisting the owner, provided that the practice is performed gratuitously.(2) Lay testing of poultry by the whole blood agglutination test. For purposes of this section, “poultry” means flocks of avian species maintained for food production, including, but not limited to, chickens, turkeys, and exotic fowl.(3) Making any determination as to the status of pregnancy, sterility, or infertility upon livestock, equine, or food animals at the time an animal is being inseminated, providing no charge is made for this determination.(4) Administering sodium pentobarbital for euthanasia of sick, injured, homeless, or surrendered domestic pets or animals without the presence of a veterinarian when the person is an employee of an animal control shelter and its agencies or humane society and has received proper training in the administration of sodium pentobarbital for these purposes.(5) Providing the following care to animals lawfully deposited with or impounded by a shelter not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853:(A) Administering preventative or prophylactic nonprescription vaccinations to the animal pursuant to protocols written by a veterinarian licensed in this state for the purposes of preventing the spread of communicable diseases, without the presence of a veterinarian when the person has received proper training in the administration of the nonprescription preventative or prophylactic vaccinations.(B) Administering nonprescription medications to the animal pursuant to protocols written by a veterinarian licensed in this state, for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites, including, but not limited to, fleas, ticks, or worms, without the presence of a veterinarian when the person has received proper training in the administration of the nonprescription medications for the control or eradication of those internal or external parasites. A person’s decision to administer these medications shall not be construed to mean the person has made a diagnosis of the animal’s medical condition.(C) Administering medications prescribed by a veterinarian licensed in the state to the animal without the presence of a veterinarian when the shelter has received a written treatment plan from the licensed veterinarian for that specific animal and has a dispensing protocol in place for the tracking of dispensed prescribed medications and when the person has received proper training in the administration of prescription medications.(b) For the purposes of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a):(1) “Proper training” means completing a training curriculum of at least four hours provided by a veterinarian licensed to practice in this state, and includes, but is not limited to, an overview of intake procedures and preventative medicine, recognizing when an animal is required to be seen by a veterinarian, prescription and nonprescription medications, humane animal restraint techniques, vaccination injection methods and procedures, and documentation.(2) “Shelter” means a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane society shelter that is not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853.(c) A shelter providing care to an animal pursuant to this section that is not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853 shall report to the board any adverse event resulting in significant impairment or death from the care provided, on a form prescribed by the board, including severe injuries, infections, and unintended reactions caused by the incorrect or inappropriate administration of a vaccine or medications.SEC. 3.5. Section 4827 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4827. (a) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person from:(1) Practicing veterinary medicine as a bona fide owner of one’s own animals, except for the procedures specified in Section 4826.8. This exemption applies to the following:(A) The owner’s bona fide employees.(B) Any person assisting the owner, provided that the practice is performed gratuitously.(2) Lay testing of poultry by the whole blood agglutination test. For purposes of this section, “poultry” means flocks of avian species maintained for food production, including, but not limited to, chickens, turkeys, and exotic fowl.(3) Making any determination as to the status of pregnancy, sterility, or infertility upon livestock, equine, or food animals at the time an animal is being inseminated, providing no charge is made for this determination.(4) Administering sodium pentobarbital for euthanasia of sick, injured, homeless, or surrendered domestic pets or animals without the presence of a veterinarian when the person is administering the treatment in their capacity as an employee of an animal control shelter and its agencies or humane society and has received proper training in the administration of sodium pentobarbital for these purposes.(5) Providing the following care to animals lawfully deposited with or impounded by a shelter not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853:(A) Administering preventative or prophylactic nonprescription vaccinations to the animal pursuant to protocols written by a veterinarian licensed in this state for the purposes of preventing the spread of communicable diseases, without the presence of a veterinarian when the person has received proper training in the administration of the nonprescription preventative or prophylactic vaccinations.(B) Administering nonprescription medications to the animal pursuant to protocols written by a veterinarian licensed in this state, for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites, including, but not limited to, fleas, ticks, or worms, without the presence of a veterinarian when the person has received proper training in the administration of the nonprescription medications for the control or eradication of those internal or external parasites. A person’s decision to administer these medications shall not be construed to mean the person has made a diagnosis of the animal’s medical condition.(C) Administering medications prescribed by a veterinarian licensed in the state to the animal without the presence of a veterinarian when the shelter has received a written treatment plan from the licensed veterinarian for that specific animal and has a dispensing protocol in place for the tracking of dispensed prescribed medications and when the person has received proper training in the administration of prescription medications.(b) For the purposes of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a):(1) “Proper training” means completing a training curriculum of at least four hours provided by a veterinarian licensed to practice in this state, and includes, but is not limited to, an overview of intake procedures and preventative medicine, recognizing when an animal is required to be seen by a veterinarian, prescription and nonprescription medications, humane animal restraint techniques, vaccination injection methods and procedures, and documentation.(2) “Shelter” means a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane society shelter that is not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853.(c) A shelter providing care to an animal pursuant to this section that is not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853 shall report to the board any adverse event resulting in significant impairment or death from the care provided, on a form prescribed by the board, including severe injuries, infections, and unintended reactions caused by the incorrect or inappropriate administration of a vaccine or medications.SEC. 4. Section 4883 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4883. The board may deny, revoke, or suspend a license or registration or assess a fine as provided in Section 4875 for any of the following:(a) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of veterinary medicine, surgery, or dentistry, in which case the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence.(b) For having professional connection with, or lending the licensee’s or registrant’s name to, any illegal practitioner of veterinary medicine and the various branches thereof.(c) Violation or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, any of the provisions of this chapter.(d) Fraud or dishonesty in applying, treating, or reporting on tuberculin or other biological tests.(e) Employment of anyone but a veterinarian licensed in the state to demonstrate the use of biologics in the treatment of animals.(f) False or misleading advertising.(g) Unprofessional conduct, that includes, but is not limited to, the following:(1) Conviction of a charge of violating any federal statutes or rules or any statute or rule of this state regulating dangerous drugs or controlled substances. The record of the conviction is conclusive evidence thereof. A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The board may order the license or registration to be suspended or revoked, or assess a fine, or decline to issue a license or registration, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4, 1210.1, or 3063.1 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.(2) (A) The use of, or prescribing for or administering to oneself, any controlled substance.(B) The use of any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or of alcoholic beverages to the extent, or in any manner as to be dangerous or injurious to a person licensed or registered under this chapter, or to any other person or to the public, or to the extent that the use impairs the ability of the person so licensed or registered to conduct with safety the practice authorized by the license or registration.(C) The conviction of more than one misdemeanor or any felony involving the use, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances referred to in this section or any combination thereof, and the record of the conviction is conclusive evidence.A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The board may order the license or registration to be suspended or revoked or assess a fine, or may decline to issue a license or registration, when the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4, 1210.1, or 3063.1 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.(3) A violation of any federal statute, rule, or regulation or any of the statutes, rules, or regulations of this state regulating dangerous drugs or controlled substances.(h) Failure to keep the licensee’s or registrant’s premises and all equipment therein in a clean and sanitary condition.(i) Fraud, deception, negligence, or incompetence in the practice of veterinary medicine.(j) Aiding or abetting in any acts that are in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.(k) The employment of fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in obtaining the license or registration.(l) The revocation, suspension, or other discipline by another state or territory of a license, certificate, or registration to practice veterinary medicine or as a veterinary technician in that state or territory.(m) Cruelty to animals, conviction on a charge of cruelty to animals, or both.(n) Disciplinary action taken by any public agency in any state or territory for any act substantially related to the practice of veterinary medicine or the practice of a veterinary technician.(o) Violation, or the assisting or abetting violation, of any regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.(p) Accepting, soliciting, or offering any form of remuneration from or to a cannabis licensee if the veterinarian or the veterinarian’s immediate family have a financial interest with the cannabis licensee. For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Cannabis licensee” shall have the same meaning as “licensee” in Section 26001.(2) “Financial interest” shall have the same meaning as in Section 650.01.(q) Discussing or recommending cannabis for use with a client while the veterinarian is employed by, or has an agreement with, a cannabis licensee. For purposes of this subdivision, “cannabis licensee” shall have the same meaning as “licensee” in Section 26001.(r) Distributing any form of advertising for cannabis in California.(s) Making any statement, claim, or advertisement that the licensee or registrant is a veterinary specialist or board certified unless they are certified by an American Veterinary Medical Association-Recognized Veterinary Specialty Organization or a National Association of Veterinary Technicians in America-Recognized Veterinary Specialty Organization.(t) Exercising control over, interfering with, or attempting to influence the professional judgment of another California-licensed veterinarian or registered veterinary technician through coercion, extortion, inducement, collusion, or intimidation through any means, including, but not limited to, compensation, in order to require the other California-licensed veterinarian or registered veterinary technician to perform veterinary services in a manner inconsistent with current veterinary medical practice in this state.(u) Performing a surgical claw removal, declawing, onychectomy, or a tendonectomy on any feline or otherwise altering a feline’s toes, claws, or paws to prevent or impair the normal function of the feline’s toes, claws, or paws for any reason other than a therapeutic purpose.SEC. 4.5. Section 4883 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:4883. The board may deny, revoke, suspend, or place on probation a license, registration, or permit or assess a fine as provided in Section 4875 for any of the following:(a) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of veterinary medicine, surgery, or dentistry, in which case the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence.(b) For having professional connection with, or lending the licensee’s, registrant’s, or permitholder’s name to, any illegal practitioner of veterinary medicine and the various branches thereof.(c) Violation or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, any of the provisions of this chapter.(d) Fraud or dishonesty in applying, treating, or reporting on tuberculin or other biological tests.(e) Employment of anyone but a veterinarian licensed in the state to demonstrate the use of biologics in the treatment of animals.(f) False or misleading advertising.(g) Unprofessional conduct, that includes, but is not limited to, the following:(1) Conviction of a charge of violating any federal statutes or rules or any statute or rule of this state regulating dangerous drugs or controlled substances. The record of the conviction is conclusive evidence thereof. A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The board may order the license, registration, or permit to be suspended or revoked, or assess a fine, or decline to issue a license, registration, or permit when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4, 1210.1, or 3063.1 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.(2) (A) The use of, or prescribing for or administering to oneself, any controlled substance.(B) The use of any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or of alcoholic beverages to the extent, or in any manner as to be dangerous or injurious to a person issued a license, registration, or permit under this chapter, or to any other person or to the public, or to the extent that the use impairs the ability of the licensee, registrant, or permitholder to conduct with safety the practice authorized by the license, registration, or permit.(C) The conviction of more than one misdemeanor or any felony involving the use, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances referred to in this section or any combination thereof, and the record of the conviction is conclusive evidence.A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The board may order the license, registration, or permit to be suspended or revoked or assess a fine, or may decline to issue a license, registration, or permit when the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4, 1210.1, or 3063.1 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.(3) A violation of any federal statute, rule, or regulation or any of the statutes, rules, or regulations of this state regulating dangerous drugs, including antimicrobial drugs in animal feed, or controlled substances.(h) Failure to keep the licensee’s or registrant’s premises and all equipment therein in a clean and sanitary condition.(i) Fraud, deception, negligence, or incompetence in the practice of veterinary medicine.(j) Aiding or abetting in any acts that are in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.(k) The employment of fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in obtaining the license, registration, or permit.(l) The revocation, suspension, or other discipline by another state or territory of a license, certificate, or registration to practice veterinary medicine or as a veterinary technician in that state or territory.(m) Cruelty to animals, conviction on a charge of cruelty to animals, or both.(n) Disciplinary action taken by any public agency in any state or territory for any act substantially related to the practice of veterinary medicine or the practice of a veterinary technician, or veterinary assistant controlled substance permitholder.(o) Violation, or the assisting or abetting violation, of any regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.(p) Accepting, soliciting, or offering any form of remuneration from or to a cannabis licensee if the veterinarian or the veterinarian’s immediate family have a financial interest with the cannabis licensee. For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Cannabis licensee” shall have the same meaning as “licensee” in Section 26001.(2) “Financial interest” shall have the same meaning as in Section 650.01.(q) Discussing or recommending cannabis for use with a client while the veterinarian is employed by, or has an agreement with, a cannabis licensee. For purposes of this subdivision, “cannabis licensee” shall have the same meaning as “licensee” in Section 26001.(r) Distributing any form of advertising for cannabis in California.(s) Making any statement, claim, or advertisement that the licensee or registrant is a veterinary specialist or board certified unless they are certified by an American Veterinary Medical Association-Recognized Veterinary Specialty Organization or a National Association of Veterinary Technicians in America-Recognized Veterinary Specialty Organization.(t) Exercising control over, interfering with, or attempting to influence the professional judgment of another California-licensed veterinarian or registered veterinary technician through coercion, extortion, inducement, collusion, or intimidation through any means, including, but not limited to, compensation, in order to require the other California-licensed veterinarian or registered veterinary technician to perform veterinary services in a manner inconsistent with current veterinary medical practice in this state.(u) Performing a surgical claw removal, declawing, onychectomy, or a tendonectomy on any feline or otherwise altering a feline’s toes, claws, or paws to prevent or impair the normal function of the feline’s toes, claws, or paws for any reason other than a therapeutic purpose.SEC. 5. Nothing in this measure shall be interpreted to preempt any local ordinance adopted before January 1, 2026, limiting the performance of the feline declawing procedures identified in this measure, or any penalties imposed for a violation of the ordinance.SEC. 6. Section 3.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 4827 of the Business and Professions Code proposed by both this bill and Assembly Bill 1502. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 4827 of the Business and Professions Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 1502, in which case Section 3 of this bill shall not become operative.SEC. 7. Section 4.5 of this bill incorporates amendments to Section 4883 of the Business and Professions Code proposed by both this bill and Assembly Bill 1502. That section of this bill shall only become operative if (1) both bills are enacted and become effective on or before January 1, 2026, (2) each bill amends Section 4883 of the Business and Professions Code, and (3) this bill is enacted after Assembly Bill 1502, in which case Section 4 of this bill shall not become operative.SEC. 8. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.